Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1429
Influencing, defined.

Influencing shall mean promoting, supporting, affecting, modifying, opposing, or delaying by any means, including the providing of or use of information, statistics, studies, or analyses.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 29.